Hawaii statutes.
§560:1-102 Purposes; rule of
construction. (a) This chapter shall be liberally construed and applied
to promote its underlying purposes and policies.

(b) The underlying purposes and policies of
this chapter are to:

(1) Simplify and clarify the law concerning the
affairs of decedents, missing persons, protected persons, minors and
incapacitated persons;

(2) Discover and make effective the intent of a
decedent in distribution of the decedent's property;

(3) Promote a speedy and efficient system for liquidating
the estate of the decedent and making distribution to the decedent's
successors;

(4) Facilitate use and enforcement of certain trusts;
and

(5) Make uniform the law among the various
jurisdictions. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next